California, session 20252026, AB2559.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Many cities and counties require applicants for construction and demolition permits to post refundable deposits or performance guarantees to ensure compliance with local waste diversion requirements.(b) These deposits are intended to incentivize compliance with state and local recycling and diversion laws, including, but not limited to, the California Green Building Standards Code (CALGreen).(c) Denials in returning refundable deposits after applicants have complied with all diversion and documentation requirements create unnecessary financial burdens on property owners, contractors, and small businesses.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that refundable construction and demolition debris diversion deposits are returned promptly once required documentation has been submitted and verified.SEC. 2. Article 3 (commencing with Section 48030) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code, to read: Article 3. Construction Debris Deposits48030. (a) For purposes of this section, “deposit” means a refundable deposit, performance security, or similar financial guarantee as a condition of a construction, demolition, or building permit for the purpose of ensuring compliance with a construction or demolition debris diversion requirement.(b) A city or county that collects a deposit shall return the full amount of the deposit to the person or entity that paid the deposit if, within three years of the final inspection on the work or project that was subject to the deposit, the person or entity submits documentation that demonstrates compliance with the terms of the deposit.(c) This section does not prohibit a city or county from denying a refund if the submitted documentation demonstrates noncompliance with applicable diversion requirements.